Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 7 Carey Act Lands

“Carey Act.” —

The federal Sundry Civil Appropriation Act of August 18, 1894, ch. 301, 28 Stat. 372, in § 4 thereof, authorized the grant of certain desert lands to certain states and territories. Section 4 is commonly known as the “Carey Act” and is compiled as 43 U.S.C. § 641.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d Irrigation §§ 100 to 111.

94 C.J.S. Waters §§ 760 to 765.